California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to adopt regulations to implement this subdivision no later than July 1, 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 27.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.

Child care exempt from licensure is a valid parental choice of care for all programs provided for under this part, and no provision of this part shall be construed to exclude or discourage the exercise of that choice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, child care and development programs, as defined in Section 10213.5, shall include, but not be limited to, respite child care and development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.

(a) If a state of emergency is declared by the Governor, the department may waive any requirements of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code relating to child care and development programs operated pursuant to this chapter only to the extent that enforcement of the regulations or requirements would directly impede disaster relief and recovery efforts or would disrupt the current level of service in child care and development programs.

(b) If a state of emergency is declared by the Governor, the department may waive any requirements of this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code relating to child nutrition programs in child care and development programs operated pursuant to this chapter only to the extent that
 enforcement of the regulations or requirements would directly impede disaster relief and recovery efforts or would disrupt the current level of service in child care and development programs.

(c) A waiver granted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall not exceed 45 calendar days.

(d) For purposes of this section, “state of emergency” includes, but is not limited to, fire, flood, earthquake, or a period of civil unrest.

(e) If a request for a waiver pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) is for a child care and development program or child nutrition program that receives federal funds and the waiver may be inconsistent with the state plan or any federal law or regulations governing the program, the department shall seek and obtain approval of the waiver from the appropriate federal agency before granting the waiver.

(f) (1) From July 1, 2020, to June 30, 2021, inclusive, due to the ongoing impacts of child care and development facility closures and low child attendance due to the COVID-19 pandemic and related public health directives, the Superintendent shall reimburse a contracting agency for a California state preschool program pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, a general child care and development program pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), a family child care home education network pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with 10250), a migrant child care and development program pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), or child care and development services for children with special needs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260) that meets one of the following requirements:

(A) The program operated by the contracting agency opens by September 8, 2020, or within 21 calendar days from the start date of the contracting agency’s 2020–21 program calendar approved by the department, whichever is sooner, and remains open and offering services through the 2020–21 program year.

(B) The program operated by the contracting agency is closed by local or state public health order or guidance due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(C) (i) The program operates on the campus of a local educational agency that is closed by local or state public health guidance or order and the local educational agency has required the early learning and care program to close.

(ii) To ensure continuity of care and access to services during the
 COVID-19 pandemic, the governing board or body of the local educational agency requiring a closure pursuant to clause (i) shall discuss in a public hearing and prepare a plan for safely reopening early learning and care programs as soon as safely possible, but no later than when local education agency campuses open for in-person instruction.

(2) Reimbursement pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be 100 percent of the contract maximum reimbursable amount or net reimbursable program costs, whichever is less, pursuant to guidance released by the Superintendent.

(3) A child care program specified in paragraph (1) that is physically closed pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) due to the COVID-19 pandemic, but funded to be operational, shall provide distance learning services as specified by the Superintendent. A contractor specified in paragraph (1) shall submit a distance
 learning plan to the department pursuant to guidance from the Superintendent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.1. Online Portal for Child Care and Development Services [10216. - 10216.]

10216.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in adopting this chapter that every family in California have access to current and robust information regarding the state’s vast array of child care and development services through a publicly available online portal hosted and maintained by the department that includes, among other things, program and eligibility information, the opportunity to connect with resource and referral agencies and providers, the ability to use an online eligibility screening tool in order to assess eligibility for services, a way to link to local child care resource and referral agencies and alternative payment programs for additional assistance in selecting and assessing child care, and access to placement on waiting lists for local subsidized child care programs.

(b) On or before June 30, 2022, the department shall develop and post on the department’s Internet Web site, for use by the general public, an online portal for California’s comprehensive child care and development services.

(c) (1) In planning for future enhancements to the online portal, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall convene, on or before June 30, 2019, a workgroup made up of stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of child care resource and referral programs, alternative payment programs, contracted center-based programs, First 5 county commissions, county offices of education, school-based providers, private center-based care providers, and family child care homes. This workgroup shall, on or before June 30, 2020, evaluate, and provide recommendations to the Superintendent of Public Instruction on any necessary
 modifications or improvements to the online portal to ensure its improved effectiveness, including the consideration of possible models for, and plans for inclusion in the online portal of, components, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Components to link parents to local child care resource and referral agencies and alternative payment programs for additional assistance in selecting and assessing child care and to place parents on waiting lists for local subsidized child care programs for which subsidized slots are not readily available.

(B) An online eligibility screening tool used to assess eligibility for services.

(2) (A) On or before January 1, 2021, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit to the appropriate committees of the Legislature a comprehensive
 plan for implementing the recommendations of the workgroup and a report proposing plans for enhancements to the online portal, based on recommendations received from the workgroup developed pursuant to paragraph (1), including the components described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1).

(B) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract with an outside entity for purposes of completing the report required pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(C) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report imposed by this paragraph is inoperative on January 1, 2025.

(d) The requirements of this section are subject to the availability of public or private funding for the purposes of this section. The department may accept grants or in-kind support from any source, public or
 private, to help perform the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Resource and Referral Programs [10217. - 10224.5.]

10217.

Funds appropriated for the purpose of this chapter may be used for child care resource and referral programs which may be operated by public or private nonprofit entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10218.

It is the intent of the Legislature that one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) be appropriated each fiscal year for allocation to child care and development resource and referral agencies operated by local educational agencies for the purpose of the child care resources and referral program set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10219.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, child care resource and referral programs, established to serve a defined geographic area, shall provide the following services:

(1) (A) Identification of the full range of existing child care services through information provided by all relevant public and private agencies in the areas of service, and the development of a resource file of those services which shall be maintained and updated at least quarterly. These services shall include, but not be limited to, family child care homes, public and private child care programs, full-time and part-time programs, and infant, preschool, and extended care programs.

(B) The resource file shall
 include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(i) Type of program.

(ii) Hours of service.

(iii) Ages of children served.

(iv) Fees and eligibility for services.

(v) Significant program information.

(2) (A) (i) Establishment of a referral process which responds to parental need for information and which is provided with full recognition of the confidentiality rights of parents. Resource and referral programs shall make referrals to licensed child day care facilities. Referrals shall be made to unlicensed care facilities only if there is no requirement that the facility
 be licensed. The referral process shall afford parents maximum access to all referral information. This access shall include, but is not limited to, telephone referrals to be made available for at least 30 hours per week as part of a full week of operation. Every effort shall be made to reach all parents within the defined geographic area, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Toll-free telephone lines.

(II) Office space convenient to parents and providers.

(III) Referrals in languages which are spoken in the community.

(ii) Each child care resource and referral program shall publicize its services through all available media sources, agencies, and other appropriate methods.

(B) (i) Provision of information to any person who requests a child care referral of their right to view the licensing information of a licensed child day care facility required to be maintained at the facility pursuant to Section 1596.859 of the Health and Safety Code and to access any public files pertaining to the facility that are maintained by the department’s Community Care Licensing Division.

(ii) A written or oral advisement in substantially the following form will comply with the requirements of clause (i):

“State law requires licensed child day care facilities to make accessible to the public a copy of any licensing report pertaining to the facility that documents a facility visit or a substantiated complaint investigation. In addition, a more complete file regarding a child care licensee may be available at an office of the State Department of Social Services’ Community Care
 Licensing Division. You have the right to access any public information in these files.”

(3) (A) Maintenance of ongoing documentation of requests for service tabulated through the internal referral process. The following documentation of requests for service shall be maintained by all child care resource and referral programs:

(i) Number of calls and contacts to the child care information and referral program or component.

(ii) Ages of children served.

(iii) Time category of child care request for each child.

(iv) Special time category, such as nights, weekends, and swing shift.

(v) Reason that the child
 care is needed.

(B) This information shall be maintained in a manner that is easily accessible for dissemination purposes and shall be accessible to local child care and development planning councils authorized pursuant to Section 10486 and any county implementing an individualized county child care subsidy plan.

(4) Provision of technical assistance to existing and potential providers of all types of child care services. This assistance shall include, but not be limited to:

(A) Information on all aspects of initiating new child care services including, but not limited to, licensing, zoning, program and budget development, and assistance in finding this information from other sources.

(B) Information and resources that help existing child care services
 providers to maximize their ability to serve the children and parents of their community.

(C) Dissemination of information on current public issues affecting the local and state delivery of child care services.

(D) Facilitation of communication between existing child care and child-related services providers in the community served.

(5) (A) (i) Provision of a child care navigator to support children in foster care, children previously in foster care upon return to their home of origin, and children of parents involved in the child welfare system, including the children of nonminor dependents. The navigator shall work with the child’s family, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 11461.6, and the child’s social worker and child and family team to assess
 child care opportunities appropriate to the child’s age and needs, assist the family in identifying potential opportunities for an ongoing child care subsidy, assist the caregiver in completing appropriate child care program applications, and develop an overall, long-term child care plan for the child.

(ii) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this subparagraph, each resource and referral program shall develop and enter into a memorandum of understanding, contract, or other formal agreement with the county child welfare agency in order to facilitate interagency communication and, to the maximum extent possible, to leverage federal funding, including administrative funding, available pursuant to Title IV–E of the federal Social Security Act, to enhance the navigation support authorized under this subparagraph, or the resource and referral program shall explain, in writing, annually, why entering into a memorandum of understanding,
 contract, or other formal agreement with the county child welfare agency is not practical or feasible. Navigator services provided pursuant to this subparagraph shall be made available to any child in foster care, any child previously in foster care who has returned to their home of origin, and any child of parents involved in the child welfare system, including any child who meets the eligibility criteria for the Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children established pursuant to Section 11461.6. Eligibility for navigator services shall not be contingent on a child’s receipt of a child care payment or voucher.

(B) (i) Provision of trauma-informed training and coaching to child care providers working with children, and children of parenting youth, in the foster care system. Training shall include, but not be limited to, infant and toddler development and research-based, trauma-informed best care practices.
 Child care providers shall be provided with coaching to assist them in applying training techniques and strategies for working with children, and children of parenting youth, in foster care.

(ii) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this subparagraph, each resource and referral program, in coordination with the California Child Care Resource and Referral Network, shall develop and enter into a memorandum of understanding, contract, or other formal agreement with the county child welfare agency in order to, to the maximum extent possible, leverage federal funding, including training funds, available pursuant to Title IV–E of the federal Social Security Act, to enhance the training support authorized under this subparagraph, or the resource and referral agency shall explain, in writing, annually, why entering into a memorandum of understanding, contract, or other formal agreement with the county child welfare agency is not practical or
 feasible.

(b) Services prescribed by this section shall be provided in order to maximize parental choice in the selection of child care to facilitate the maintenance and development of child care services and resources.

(c) (1) A program operating pursuant to this chapter shall, within two business days of receiving notice, remove a licensed child day care facility with a revocation or a temporary suspension order, or that is on probation from the program’s referral list.

(2) A program operating pursuant to this chapter shall, within two business days of receiving notice, notify all entities, operating a program under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) and Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) in the program’s jurisdiction, of a licensed child day care facility with a revocation or a
 temporary suspension order, or that is on probation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10220.

(a) In addition to the services described in Section 10219, a child care resource and referral program, established to serve a defined geographic area, may provide short-term respite child care. “Short-term respite care,” for purposes of this chapter, means temporary child care services to do any of the following:

(1) Provide services to families identified and referred by child protective agencies.

(2) Relieve the stress caused by child abuse, neglect, or exploitation, or the risk of abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

(3) Assist parents who, because of serious illness or injury, homelessness, or family crisis,
 including temporary absence from the home because of illness or injury, would be unable without assistance to provide the normal care and nurture expected of parents.

(4) Provide temporary relief to parents from the care of children with exceptional needs.

(b) Pursuant to the delivery of short-term respite child care services, priority shall be given for the provision of services to families identified and referred by child protective agencies, to relieve the stress caused by child abuse, neglect, or exploitation, or the risks thereof, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a). Priority shall be given to assist parents and to provide temporary relief to parents, as described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) to the extent that resources are available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10221.

All child care resource and referral services shall be provided in a manner which is responsive to the diverse cultural, linguistic, and economic needs of a defined geographic area of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10222.

Child care resources and referral shall be provided to all persons requesting services and to all types of child care providers, regardless of income level or other eligibility criteria. In addition to the services prescribed by this section, child care resource and referral may provide a wide variety of parent and provider support and educational services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10223.

(a) There is hereby established a project known as the California Child Care Initiative Project. It is the intent of the Legislature to promote and foster the project in cooperation with private corporations and local governments. The objective of the project is to increase the availability of quality childcare programs in the state.

(b) For purposes of this section, the California Child Care Initiative Project means a project to expand the role and functions of selected resource and referral agencies in activities including needs assessment, recruitment and
 screening of providers, technical assistance, and staff development and training, in order to aid communities in increasing their capability in the number of childcare spaces available and the quality of childcare services offered.

(c) The department shall allocate all state funds appropriated for the California Child Care Initiative Project for the purpose of making grants to those childcare resource and referral agencies that have been selected as pilot sites for the project.

(d) The grants to the sites made available by the project shall be composed of a combination of state funds or a combination of state funds and other funds.

(e) The department shall develop a database for the project.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by all-county letter or similar directive until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations implementing the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision no later than July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 62, Sec. 20.   (AB 210)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10224.

When making referrals, every agency operating both a direct service program and a resource and referral program shall provide at least four referrals, at least one of which shall be a provider over which the agency has no fiscal or operational control, as well as information to a family on the family’s ability to choose a license exempt provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10224.5.

(a) Federal funds allocated to local child care resource and referral agencies to support their continued participation in COVID-19 relief and recovery shall include, but not be limited to, strengthening their role in serving as intermediaries to develop new, and support existing, child care facilities and capacity, and to streamline and improve data collection processes in collaboration with the state for use by the agencies and by the state. Additional data reporting shall include gathering data from providers and updating information on child care provider status, capacity, and vacancy at least once a month. Data collected shall be provided to the department or its designee at least monthly. The department shall provide guidance regarding data collection and reporting requirements pursuant to this
 section.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to allocate funds for the purposes described in subdivision (a) annually, subject to an appropriation for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Alternative Payment Programs [10225. - 10234.]

10225.

(a) Upon the approval of the department, funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter may be used for alternative payment programs to allow for maximum parental choice. Various methods of reimbursement for parental costs for child care may be utilized. All payment arrangements shall conform to the eligibility criteria and the parent fee schedule established pursuant to Sections 10271 and 10280.

(b) To provide for maximum parental choice, alternative payment programs may include the following:

(1) A subsidy that follows the family from one provider to another within a given alternative payment program.

(2) Choices, whenever possible, among hours of service including before and after school, evenings, weekends, and split shifts.

(3) Child care and development services according to parental choice, including use of family child care homes, general center based programs, and other state-funded programs to the extent that those programs exist in the general service area and are in conformity with the purposes and applicable laws for which those programs were established, but excluding state preschool programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10225.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) Working families be supported with maximum access to child care and development programs that focus on stabilizing families and helping children realize greater education outcomes.

(2) Working families have access to the supportive services needed to ensure the healthy physical, cognitive, social, and emotional growth and development of children.

(3) The department, in providing funding to child care and development agencies, promote a contracting term for services that will allow parents the opportunity to choose the type of care most suited to their
 needs.

(4) Working families achieve and maintain their personal, social, economic, and emotional stability through an opportunity to attain financial stability through employment and parental development while maximizing the growth and development of their children, and through enhancing their parenting skills through participation in child care and development programs.

(b) The department shall contract with local contracting agencies for alternative payment programs so that services will be provided throughout the state. The department shall expand existing alternative payment programs and fund new alternative payment programs to the extent that funds are provided by the Legislature.

(c) Funding for the new programs pursuant to this section shall be allocated to programs that meet all of the following
 requirements:

(1) Applicants shall conform to the requirements of this chapter.

(2) Applicants shall demonstrate that an alternative payment child development program is an appropriate method of delivering child care services within the county or service area at the level requested in the application by doing either of the following:

(A) Demonstrating the availability of sufficient licensed or exempt child care providers.

(B) Providing a plan for the development of sufficient licensed child care providers working in cooperation with the local resource and referral agency.

(3) Applicants shall demonstrate the administrative viability of the alternative payment agency and its capacity to
 meet performance requirements.

(4) Existing alternative payment child development programs receiving funds for expansion into a new service area shall be funded at a documented rate appropriate to that community and may contract separately as appropriate.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), an alternative payment program shall have no less than 12 months, and no more than 24 months, to expend funds allocated to that program in any fiscal year.

(2) The department shall develop a process that provides alternative payment programs no less than 12 months, and no more than 24 months, to expend funds allocated to that program in any fiscal year.

(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) do not apply to contracts relating to the administration of child care services
 described in Sections 10372 and 10372.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10226.

(a) Alternative payment programs shall serve an identifiable geographic area approved by the department. The service area may be delineated by jurisdictional city or county boundaries, by natural geographic barriers, streets, roads, or zip codes.

(b) In the appropriation of expansion funds allocated in this section and in Assembly Bill 55 of the 1985–86 Regular Session of the Legislature, first priority shall be given to develop the alternative payment programs in unserved areas of the state.

(c) Second priority shall be given to expand current alternative payment programs. The department shall reserve funds to ensure that at least 50 percent of the moneys allotted for the
 alternative payment program in both Assembly Bill 55 of the 1985–86 Regular Session of the Legislature and this section shall be used to fund this second priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10226.5.

To offer maximum support for parents and providers, alternative payment programs shall have access to resource and referral services. Funding shall be adequate to purchase care at the fee charged the private client for the same service as well as to provide locally designed support services for parents and providers. In communities where there are no resource and referral agencies, alternative payment programs shall provide the following support services:

(a) Information for parents to assist them in making informed choices.

(b) Professional and technical assistance and information for providers.

(c) Parenting
 information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10227.

Alternative payments may be made for services provided in licensed centers and family child care homes, for care provided in the child’s home, and for other types of care which conform to applicable law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10227.5.

(a) Childcare providers authorized to provide services pursuant to this chapter shall submit to the alternative payment program a monthly attendance record or invoice for each child who received services that, at a minimum, documents the dates and actual times care was provided each day, including the time the child entered and the time the child left care each day. The information shall be documented on a daily basis.

(b) (1) The monthly attendance record or invoice shall, at a minimum, be signed by the parent or guardian of the child receiving services and the childcare provider once per month to attest that the child’s attendance is accurately reflected. The verification of attendance shall be made by signature at the end of each month
 of care and under penalty of perjury by both the parent or guardian of the child receiving services and the childcare provider.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) and pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10277, a childcare provider may submit a monthly attendance record or invoice without a parent’s signature when the parent has not communicated with the provider for a minimum of seven consecutive days, the provider has notified the contractor of the parent’s lack of communication in accordance with Section 18066.5 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and the contractor has documented the provider’s unsuccessful attempts to collect a signature.

(B) If the provisions of this paragraph are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling
 without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature.

(c) The monthly attendance record or invoice shall be maintained by the childcare provider in the unaltered original format in which it was created, which may be in paper form or electronic format.

(d) (1) The alternative payment program shall accept the monthly attendance record or invoice as documentation of the hours of care provided if the attendance record or invoice includes adequate information documented on a daily basis, including, at a minimum, the dates and actual times care was provided each day, including the time the child entered and the time the child left care each day.

(2) Except as described in paragraph (3), the alternative payment program shall reimburse childcare providers based upon the following criteria:

(A) The hours of service provided that are broadly consistent with certified hours of need.

(B) For families with variable schedules, the actual days and hours of attendance, up to the maximum certified hours.

(C) For license-exempt providers that provide part-time services, the actual days and hours of attendance, up to the maximum certified hours.

(3) Effective July 1, 2025, and to July 1, 2028, inclusive, reimbursement of state-subsidized childcare and development providers, including licensed daycare centers, as defined in Section 1596.76 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed family daycare homes, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, and license-exempt providers, that serve children through alternative payment programs, including migrant alternative payment programs pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225), family childcare home education networks pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250), or the CalWORKs Stage 1, Stage 2, or Stage 3 programs pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370), or the Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children pursuant to Section 11461.6, shall be based on families’ certified need, as follows:

(A) Providers shall be reimbursed based on the maximum authorized hours of care, regardless of attendance.

(B) For families certified for a variable schedule, providers shall be reimbursed based on the maximum authorized hours of care.

(C) For license-exempt providers that provide part-time services, providers shall be reimbursed based on the maximum authorized hours of care.

(e) For purposes of reimbursement to providers through an alternative payment program, contractors shall not be required to track absences.

(f) For purposes of this section, a monthly attendance record or invoice is defined as documentation that includes, at a minimum, the name of the child receiving services, the dates
 and actual times care was provided each day, including the time the child entered and the time the child left care each day, that is signed under penalty of perjury by both the parent or guardian and the childcare provider, attesting that the information provided is accurate.

(g) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the sum of eighty-eight million five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($88,550,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Social Services for the purpose of reimbursement based on families’ certified need as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d). These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2026.

(h) If subdivision (d) is in conflict with a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 10426, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions
 of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   (SB 151)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10227.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to use an alternative methodology, as defined in subdivision (ak) of Section 10213.5, to inform the setting of reimbursement rates for subsidized childcare.

(b) Reimbursement rates are subject to agreement and codification by the Legislature.

(c) The department, in collaboration with the State Department of Education, shall develop and conduct an alternative methodology. The department shall begin the process of data collection and analysis pursuant to developing an alternative methodology by July 1, 2023, and consult with the State Department of Education on data collection, analysis, and methodology for preschool programs. The alternative methodology
 shall build on the recommendations of the working group established pursuant to Section 10280.2 and shall be aligned with the recommendations of the Joint Labor Management Committee established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10280.2.

(d) No later than February 15, 2024, the department, in collaboration with the State Department of Education and the Joint Labor Management Committee established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10280.2, using information from the cost estimation model, shall define elements of the base rate and any enhanced rates to inform the state’s proposed single rate structure and rates. These elements shall be subject to the mandated public engagement state plan process and legislative review. The department shall report to the Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Education budget subcommittees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on progress made to conduct an alternative
 methodology and cost estimate model.

(e) No later than May 15, 2024, the department shall report on the status of the draft Child Care and Development Fund state plan to the Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Education budget subcommittees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the state’s proposed single rate structure to be submitted to the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families.

(f) No later than July 1, 2024, the department shall submit necessary information to support use of a single rate structure using the alternative methodology to the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families in the Child Care and Development Fund state plan or an amendment to the state plan. The department shall provide a copy of the Child Care and
 Development Fund state plan or amendment to the state plan submitted to the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families to the Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Education budget subcommittees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office no later than July 10, 2024.
